Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.130

Services to poor and disadvantaged persons—Preschool children—Substance abuse—Family services—Fire protection and emergency management.

(1) The department shall coordinate services to communities that are directed to the poor and disadvantaged through private and public nonprofit organizations and units of general purpose local governments. The department shall coordinate these programs using, to the extent possible, integrated case management methods, with other community and economic development efforts that promote self-sufficiency.

(2) These services may include, but not be limited to, comprehensive education services to preschool children from low-income families, providing for human service needs and advocacy, promoting volunteerism and citizen service as a means for accomplishing local community and economic development goals, and providing for human service needs through community-based organizations.

(3) The department shall provide local communities and at-risk individuals with programs that provide community protection and assist in developing strategies to reduce substance abuse. The department shall administer programs that develop collaborative approaches to prevention, intervention, and interdiction programs. The department shall administer programs that support crime victims, address youth and domestic violence problems, provide indigent defense for low-income persons, border town disputes, and administer family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025.

(4) The department shall provide fire protection and emergency management services to support and strengthen local capacity for controlling risk to life, property, and community vitality that may result from fires, emergencies, and disasters.

[ 2010 c 68 s 2; 1993 c 280 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 68: See note following RCW 43.23.290.